Indiana, session 2026, SB210.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-8.2-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 6. Compact for a Safe and Equal Convention of States
Sec. 1. For purposes of this chapter, "compact" means the
compact for a safe and equal convention of the states adopted
under section 7 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. For purposes of this chapter, "commission" means the
formal resolution, enactment, or other document that:
(1) sets forth the identity of a state's delegates to a convention;
(2) establishes the delegate's credentials; and
(3) provides specific instructions as to how delegates shall vote
or otherwise perform their duties at the convention.
Sec. 3. For purposes of this chapter, "convention" or
"convention of the states" means a convention called by the
Congress of the United States under its mandatory, ministerial
duty under Article V of the Constitution of the United States upon
SB 210—LS 6837/DI 144


receiving applications for a convention to propose amendments on
a particular topic or topics from two-thirds (2/3) of the several
states.
Sec. 4. (a) For purposes of this chapter, "state" means one (1) of
the several states of the United States.
(b) In the context of Article V, the state may only act through its
state legislative body. No other official or agency, including the
governor of any state, may take any action for the state as it
pertains to the exercise of Article V power, which is a matter
reserved by the text of the Constitution of the United States
exclusively for the legislature of each state.
Sec. 5. (a) For purposes of this chapter, "member state" means
a state that has adopted the compact through resolution or another
legislative vehicle that the state normally employs when it exercises
power under Article V of the Constitution of the United States to
apply for a convention of the states or to ratify a proposed
amendment to the Constitution of the United States.
(b) For a state to qualify as a member state with respect to any
other state under the compact, each state must have adopted and
agreed to be bound by substantially identical compact language.
Sec. 5.5. For purposes of this chapter, a reference to a
"delegate" means a "commissioner" as defined by IC 2-8.2-2-5.
Sec. 6. The general assembly finds the following:
(1) The founders of the Constitution of the United States
empowered state legislatures to be guardians of liberty by
giving state legislatures the power to propose amendments to
the Constitution of the United States by calling for a
convention of the states whenever two-thirds (2/3) of the states
apply for a convention for the same topic or purpose.
(2) The legislatures of each state have the sole power and
discretion to name their delegates and to give them
instructions as may be necessary and lawful.
(3) The history surrounding the ratification of the
Constitution of the United States and the first uses of the
states' Article V power clearly demonstrate that said
assemblies were described as a convention of the states.
(4) It is inherent in the nature of a convention of the states, as
a meeting of equal sovereigns, that the states vote on the basis
of equality.
(5) The agreement between the states concerning the subject
matter of a convention of the states is demonstrated by
two-thirds (2/3) of the several states applying for a convention
SB 210—LS 6837/DI 144


for the same purpose or topic.
(6) Litigation surrounding the attempt by the Congress of the
United States to change the deadline for the ratification of the
proposed Equal Rights Amendment has established a clear
rule that once a given phase of the Article V amendment
process has been completed, its product cannot be altered.
(7) The Supreme Court of the United States has recognized
that states have the inherent power to form agreements
between themselves for mutually beneficial purposes.
(8) The Compact Clause in Article I, Section 10, Clause 3 of
the Constitution of the United States affirms the sovereign
power of the several states to enter into binding, enforceable
agreements.
(9) The Supreme Court of the United States has repeatedly
affirmed that an interstate compact does not require
congressional approval "if it does not impermissibly enhance
state power at the expense of federal supremacy".
(10) The Congress of the United States has no power to name,
control, or instruct any state's delegates to a convention of the
states.
(11) The Congress of the United States has no power to
change the inherent rule that all voting at a convention of the
states shall be on the basis of the equal sovereignty of the
states, namely one-state, one-vote.
(12) The Congress of the United States has no power to
designate topics for a convention of the states, but rather has
a ministerial duty to call the convention upon receipt of
applications from two-thirds (2/3) of the several states for a
convention to propose amendments on the same topic or
subject.
(13) The member states to the compact wish to affirm the two
(2) inherent rules so that all states will be empowered to
exercise their Article V power to apply for a convention with
assurance that the topic or subject matter of the convention
may not be changed by the Congress of the United States, any
state, or the convention itself, and that states will vote as
states, enjoying equal suffrage at the convention.
(14) The compact is applicable to any convention of the states
no matter the topic or subject for which it is called.
Sec. 7. The compact for a safe and equal convention of the states
is adopted for the purpose of entering into a binding agreement
between the State of Indiana and other member states to instruct
SB 210—LS 6837/DI 144


their delegates to any convention of the states called by the
Congress of the United States under Article V of the Constitution
of the United States in accordance with this chapter.
Sec. 8. (a) Each state that adopts the compact and agrees to be
bound by the compact intends to ensure that at any convention of
the states, called for any purpose, that the following two (2)
inherent Article V convention rules are followed without exception:
(1) All voting is conducted on the basis of one-state, one-vote.
(2) The convention shall not consider any proposed
amendment on any topic other than the topics or subjects
specifically enumerated in the applications of two-thirds (2/3)
of the several states which formed the basis for the call of the
convention.
(b) In consideration of the mutual promises and obligations
expressed by each member state, it is firmly resolved and adopted
by every state approving the compact that the state agrees to be
bound by the compact notwithstanding any law to the contrary.
Sec. 9. (a) Each state shall instruct and bind each member of its
delegation to a convention to vote for and take any and all
appropriate action necessary to ensure the adoption of and faithful
compliance with the following three (3) rules for a convention of
the states:
(1) All voting at any convention shall be on the basis of
one-state, one-vote.
(2) No proposed amendment to the Constitution of the United
States may be introduced, reviewed, debated, or adopted if it
is outside the scope of the topic or subject established by the
applications of two-thirds (2/3) of the several states which led
to the calling of the convention by the Congress of the United
States.
(3) This subsection may not be amended, repealed,
overridden, or otherwise avoided in any manner by any other
motion, action, rule, or vote by the convention or by a ruling
of the presiding officer.
(b) Nothing in this chapter limits the power of a state to instruct
or bind its delegation in any other manner not inconsistent with
this chapter.
(c) Nothing in this section prohibits a state from adopting other
legal sanctions, penalties, or punishments for any delegate who acts
unfaithfully in violation of the delegate's duties, instructions, or
other obligations.
Sec. 10. (a) The commission of each member state delegate
SB 210—LS 6837/DI 144


must:
(1) include the member state's instructions to the delegate to
vote for and take any and all appropriate action necessary to
ensure the adoption of and faithful compliance with the rules
set forth in section 8(a) of this chapter;
(2) explicitly list the rules set forth in section 8(a) of this
chapter; and
(3) state that any action taken by the delegate in violation of
section 8 of this chapter is void as an ultra vires action,
according to common law principles of agency.
(b) Upon receiving his or her commission, each delegate shall
sign an oath that includes an acknowledgment that the delegate is
subject to immediate removal from the state's delegation by the
legislature if said delegate fails to comply with section 8 of this
chapter in any manner.
Sec. 11. The compact enters into force when twenty-six (26)
states have adopted the compact.
Sec. 12. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), a state may
withdraw from the compact if it provides twelve (12) months'
notice to the presiding officers of both houses of the legislatures of
all member states. This notice requirement applies even if the
compact has not entered into force.
(b) Withdrawal under subsection (a) may be accomplished only
through the same form of legislative action that was employed for
the initial adoption of the compact.
(c) A member state may not withdraw from the compact after
the date of the passage of the thirty-fourth application for a
convention of the states on the same topic or subject.
Sec. 13. Each member state expressly waives sovereign
immunity for an action by any other member state to enforce the
compact in any court with lawful jurisdiction of the subject matter.
Sec. 14. The principal clerk of the house of representatives shall
transmit duly authenticated copies of the compact to the presiding
officers of each house of the legislatures of all sister states. As a
courtesy, the principal clerk of the house of representatives shall
transmit duly authenticated copies of the compact to the presiding
officers of each house of the Congress of the United States.
SB 210—LS 6837/DI 144


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Elections, to which was
referred Senate Bill No. 210, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with the
recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 2, between lines 20 and 21, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 5.5. For purposes of this chapter, a reference to a
"delegate" means a "commissioner" as defined by IC 2-8.2-2-5.".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 210 as introduced.)
GASKILL, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 7, Nays 2.
SB 210—LS 6837/DI 144